ko: 바인딩 포함 여부: 플랫(바인딩 없음); 통합 시스템; 개별 바인딩 포함; 기타
de: Enthaltene Bindung: Flat (ohne Bindungen); Integriertes System; Separate Bindungen enthalten; Sonstige
sv: Bindande inkludering: Platt (inga bindningar); Integrerat system; Separata bindningar ingår; Övrigt
es: Inclusión de fijaciones: Plana (sin fijaciones); Sistema integrado; Fijaciones separadas incluidas; Otro
zh-TW: 包含固定器: 平面 (無固定器); 整合系統; 內附獨立固定器; 其他
hr-HR: Sadržaj vezova u paketu: Bez vezova; Integrirani sustav; Zasebni vezovi uključeni; Ostalo
en: Binding inclusion: Flat (no bindings); Integrated system; Separate bindings included; Other
fi: Myynti siteiden kanssa: Ilman siteitä (flat); Integroitu järjestelmä; Erilliset siteet mukana; Muu
nb: Bindende inkludering: Flat (uten bindinger); Integrert system; Separate bindinger inkludert; Annet
sl-SI: Vključitev vezi: Brez okovja (flat); Integriran sistem; Vključeno ločeno okovje; Drugo
ro-RO: Includerea legăturilor: Plat (fără legături); Sistem integrat; Legături separate incluse; Altele
th: การรวมอุปกรณ์ยึดล็อก: แบน (ไม่มีการยึด); ระบบผสานการทำงาน; รวมการยึดแบบแยกส่วน; อื่นๆ
ja: ビンディング包含: フラット (ビンディングなし); インテグレーテッドシステム; 個別のビンディング付属; その他
pl: Wiązania w zestawie: Płaskie (bez wiązań); System zintegrowany; Oddzielne wiązania w zestawie; Inne
da: Inklusion af bindinger: Flad (ingen bindinger); Integreret system; Separate bindinger medfølger; Andet
pt-PT: Inclusão vinculativa: Plano (sem fixações); Sistema integrado; Fixações separadas incluídas; Outros
it: Inclusione vincolante: Flat (senza attacchi); Sistema integrato; Attacchi separati inclusi; Altro
nl: Binding meegeleverd: Plat (geen bindingen); Geïntegreerd systeem; Aparte bindingen inbegrepen; Anders
cs: Určuje toleranci nebo výkonnostní třídu ložisek použitých v bruslích (např. ABEC 7, ILQ 9, Swiss).: Bez vázání (flat); Integrovaný systém; Včetně samostatného vázání; Jiné
el: Συμπερίληψη συνδέσεων: Επίπεδο (χωρίς δέστρες); Ενσωματωμένο σύστημα; Περιλαμβάνονται ξεχωριστές δέστρες; Άλλο
ru: Включение креплений: Без креплений (Flat); Интегрированная система; Отдельные крепления в комплекте; Другое
hu: Kötés tartozékként való megléte: Sík (kötés nélkül); Integrált rendszer; Külön kötések mellékelve; Egyéb
vi: Có bao gồm khóa trượt tuyết không: Phẳng (không có ngàm liên kết); Hệ thống tích hợp; Bao gồm ngàm liên kết riêng; Khác
fr: Fixations incluses: Plat (sans fixations); Système intégré; Fixations séparées incluses; Autre
sk-SK: Viazanie v cene: Bez viazania (Flat); Integrovaný systém; Súčasťou je samostatné viazanie; Iné
pt-BR: Inclusão de fixação: Plano (sem fixações); Sistema integrado; Fixações avulsas incluídas; Outro
lt-LT: Privalomas įtraukimas: Be apkaustų („Flat“); Integruota sistema; Pridedami atskiri apkaustai; Kita
zh-CN: 固定器配置情况: 平滑板（无固定器）; 集成系统; 包含独立固定器; 其他
bg-BG: Включени ски автомати: Без автомати; Интегрирана система; Включени отделни автомати; Други
tr: Bağlamanın dahil olup olmadığı: Boş (bağlama yok); Entegre sistem; Ayrı bağlamalar dahil; Diğer